lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX Q Y 186
SFX Q   um          0          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìr]um
SFX Q   rum         r          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rum
SFX Q   rum         er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rum
SFX Q   s           d          is
SFX Q   ba          eb         [èdlstvz¾]ba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [èdlstvz¾]bo
SFX Q   by          eb         [èdlstvz¾]by
SFX Q   ba          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rbo
SFX Q   by          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rbo
SFX Q   by          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^èdlrstvz¾]ba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^èdlrstvz¾]bo
SFX Q   by          b          [^èdlrstvz¾]by
SFX Q   ca          k          [srn]ca
SFX Q   co          k          [srn]co
SFX Q   ca          c          [^srn]ca
SFX Q   co          c          [^srn]co
SFX Q   e           0          e
SFX Q   a           0          [èdïfghjòpøs¹»wxz¾]a
SFX Q   o           0          [èdïfghjòpøs¹»wxz¾]o
SFX Q   y           0          [dfhpsz]y
SFX Q   ïka         dìk        ïka
SFX Q   ïko         dìk        ïko
SFX Q   ïky         dìk        ïky
SFX Q   òka         nìk        òka
SFX Q   òko         nìk        òko
SFX Q   òky         nìk        òky
SFX Q   »ka         tìk        »ka
SFX Q   »ko         tìk        »ko
SFX Q   »ky         tìk        »ky
SFX Q   ka          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ka
SFX Q   ko          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ko
SFX Q   ky          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ky
SFX Q   ka          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìï»òk]ka
SFX Q   ka          0          kka
SFX Q   ko          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìï»ò]ko
SFX Q   ky          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìï»ò]ky
SFX Q   la          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]la
SFX Q   lo          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]lo
SFX Q   ly          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ly
SFX Q   la          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]la
SFX Q   lo          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]lo
SFX Q   ly          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ly
SFX Q   ma          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ma
SFX Q   mo          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]mo
SFX Q   my          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]my
SFX Q   ma          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ma
SFX Q   mo          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]mo
SFX Q   my          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]my
SFX Q   na          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]na
SFX Q   no          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]na
SFX Q   nì          ò          nì
SFX Q   no          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ny
SFX Q   na          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]ny
SFX Q   ra          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ra
SFX Q   ro          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ro
SFX Q   ry          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ry
SFX Q   ra          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìr]ra
SFX Q   ra          0          rra
SFX Q   ro          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ro
SFX Q   ry          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ry
SFX Q   ta          t          [^h]ta
SFX Q   to          t          [^h]to
SFX Q   ty          t          [^h]ty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^c]hta
SFX Q   to          t          [^c]hto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^c]hty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^au]chta
SFX Q   to          t          [^au]chto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^au]chty
SFX Q   ta          et         [au]chta
SFX Q   to          et         [au]chto
SFX Q   ty          et         [au]chty
SFX Q   va          ev         [hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          ev         [hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          ev         [hktz]vy
SFX Q   va          v          [^hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          v          [^hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          v          [^hktz]vy
SFX Q   ek          ku         ek
SFX Q   ek          kem        ek
SFX Q   ek          ky         ek
SFX Q   ek          kù         ek
SFX Q   ek          kùm        ek
SFX Q   ek          cích       ek
SFX Q   ek          kách       èek
SFX Q   el          lu         el
SFX Q   el          le         el
SFX Q   el          lem        el
SFX Q   el          ly         el
SFX Q   el          lù         el
SFX Q   el          lùm        el
SFX Q   el          lech       el
SFX Q   nìk         òku        nìk
SFX Q   nìk         òkem       nìk
SFX Q   nìk         òky        nìk
SFX Q   nìk         òkù        nìk
SFX Q   nìk         òkùm       nìk
SFX Q   nìk         òcích      nìk
SFX Q   em          mu         em
SFX Q   em          me         em
SFX Q   em          mem        em
SFX Q   em          my         em
SFX Q   em          mù         em
SFX Q   em          mùm        em
SFX Q   em          mech       em
SFX Q   en          nu         en
SFX Q   en          ne         en
SFX Q   en          nem        en
SFX Q   en          ny         en
SFX Q   en          nù         en
SFX Q   en          nùm        en
SFX Q   en          nech       en
SFX Q   et          tu         et
SFX Q   et          te         et
SFX Q   et          tem        et
SFX Q   et          ty         et
SFX Q   et          tù         et
SFX Q   et          tùm        et
SFX Q   et          tech       et
SFX Q   ev          vu         ev
SFX Q   ev          ve         ev
SFX Q   ev          vem        ev
SFX Q   ev          vy         ev
SFX Q   ev          vù         ev
SFX Q   ev          vùm        ev
SFX Q   ev          vech       ev
SFX Q   es          u          es
SFX Q   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX Q   es          em         es
SFX Q   es          y          es
SFX Q   es          ù          es
SFX Q   es          ùm         es
SFX Q   es          ech        [^ghk]es
SFX Q   ges         zích       ges
SFX Q   ches        ¹ích       ches
SFX Q   hes         zích       [^c]hes
SFX Q   kes         cích       kes
SFX Q   os          u          os
SFX Q   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX Q   os          em         os
SFX Q   os          y          os
SFX Q   os          ù          os
SFX Q   os          ùm         os
SFX Q   os          ech        [^ghk]os
SFX Q   gos         zích       gos
SFX Q   chos        ¹ích       chos
SFX Q   hos         zích       [^c]hos
SFX Q   kos         cích       kos
SFX Q   us          u          us
SFX Q   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX Q   us          em         us
SFX Q   us          y          us
SFX Q   us          ù          us
SFX Q   us          ùm         us
SFX Q   us          ech        [^ghk]us
SFX Q   gus         zích       gus
SFX Q   chus        ¹ích       chus
SFX Q   hus         zích       [^c]hus
SFX Q   kus         cích       kus
SFX Q   smus        zmus       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmu        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zme        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmem       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmy        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmù        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmùm       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmech      ismus
SFX Q   s           tu         ns
SFX Q   s           te         ns
SFX Q   s           tem        ns
SFX Q   s           ty         ns
SFX Q   s           tù         ns
SFX Q   s           tùm        ns
SFX Q   s           tech       ns
