lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
acetylcelulóza/ZQ
aerodynamika/ZQ
agenda/ZQ
akademička/ZQ
akvarelistka/ZQ
Alhambra/ZQ
AltaVista/ZQ
amerikanistka/ZQ
analytika/ZQ
anestesioloľka/ZQ
Anjelika/ZQ
antidiabetikum/MQ
antikva/ZQ
antispasmodikum/MQ
apogeum/MQ
arganoloľka/ZQ
arteritida/ZQ
astmatička/ZQ
atletka/ZQ
au»áček/Q
automapa/ZQ
auxoloľka/ZQ
azylantka/ZQ
bahnička/ZQ
baloňáček/Q
baráčnice/ZQ
barvířka/ZQ
bavlna/ZQ
begonka/ZQ
bělozářka/ZQ
bernolákovątina/ZQ
běľenka/ZQ
bilingvismus/Q
biokosmetika/ZQ
bitonalita/ZQ
bleskovice/ZQ
bodalka/ZQ
bolerko/MQ
Borovno/MQ
bradička/ZQ
Brémy/ZQ
brosma/ZQ
břemeno/MQIR
buditelka/ZQ
bundička/ZQ
bystřina/ZQ
cejchovačka/ZQ
cenzura/ZQ
cigáro/MQ
citeček/Q
copánek/Q
cyanóza/ZQ
čajovna/ZQ
čekanka/ZQ
čertovina/ZQ
čiperka/ZQ
čokoláda/ZQ
čtyrstovka/ZQ
čupřinka/ZQ
Dánka/ZQ
debilita/ZQ
dehet/Q
děloha/ZQ
denivka/ZQ
desetina/ZQ
devadesátnice/ZQ
diabetes/Q
dietoloľka/ZQ
disciplína/ZQ
diverzita/ZQ
dobrodruľka/ZQ
dohrávka/ZQ
Dominičanka/ZQ
Dora/ZQ
dovolenka/ZQ
drátek/Q
drobnomalba/ZQ
druľstevnice/ZQ
dualismus/Q
dupárna/ZQ
dvanáctitunka/ZQ
dvojstránka/ZQ
dýhovka/ZQ
Edita/ZQ
ekosféra/ZQ
elektromechanička/ZQ
embryum/MQ
entusiasmus/Q
erko/MQ
estetično/MQ
eudaiminismus/Q
eventualita/ZQ
exocytóza/ZQ
extradice/ZQ
faląovatelka/ZQ
fauvismus/Q
fe»ačka/ZQ
filmeček/Q
flegmatismus/Q
forbína/ZQ
fotokatalýza/ZQ
Franca/ZQ
frézka/ZQ
futro/MQ
galapřehlídka/ZQ
garnitura/ZQ
geomechanika/ZQ
Gituąka/ZQ
gongorismus/Q
grimasa/ZQ
gymnasium/MQ
háječka/ZQ
Hanýľka/ZQ
Hebridy/ZQ
henka/ZQ
hexoda/ZQ
hlasivka/ZQ
hloubka/ZQ
hobra/ZQ
holokrčka/ZQ
hornatina/ZQ
houpačka/ZQ
hradba/ZQ
hrdlo/MQ
hrůza/ZQ
hudebnice/ZQ
hvězda/ZQ
Hydrus/Q
hyposenzibilita/ZQ
chata/ZQ
chmura/ZQ
Choustníkovo/MQ
chudinka/ZQ
iberątina/ZQ
ilusionistka/ZQ
individualismus/Q
inkognito/MQ
internacionalistka/ZQ
iracionalita/ZQ
Ivana/ZQ
Jaffa/ZQ
japanistka/ZQ
jedenáctiletka/ZQ
jelenice/ZQ
jezinka/ZQ
jircha/ZQ
jizvička/ZQ
juchtovice/ZQ
káčko/MQ
kaktusářka/ZQ
kamarádka/ZQ
Kampučia/ZQ
kapalina/ZQ
Kapverďanka/ZQ
karikaturistka/ZQ
kartotéka/ZQ
katalýza/ZQ
kavalkáda/ZQ
keříček/Q
Kladruby/HQ
klepačka/ZQ
klika/ZQ
klubko/MQ
knírek/Q
kokainistka/ZQ
kolejnice/ZQ
kolo/MQR
komenda/ZQ
komponenta/ZQ
koneček/Q
konserva/ZQ
konvertibilita/ZQ
Kopidlno/MQ
korepetitorka/ZQ
kosinka/ZQ
koąíček/Q
kousek/Q
koľeąinka/ZQ
Kralupy/ZQ
Kravsko/MQ
kriminoloľka/ZQ
krosnička/ZQ
kryotechnika/ZQ
křídlovka/ZQ
kuběnka/ZQ
kulajda/ZQ
kupka/ZQ
kutna/ZQ
kvazigrupa/ZQ
kyberkultura/ZQ
kyvadélko/MQ
lajdačka/ZQ
lanko/MQ
latička/ZQ
léčivo/MQ
lékárna/ZQ
leporelo/MQ
letora/ZQ
Liběna/ZQ
lidovka/ZQ
Lindava/ZQ
liąka/ZQ
lobbismus/Q
lokomotivka/ZQ
louskáček/Q
Ludvika/ZQ
Luľice/ZQ
maceąka/ZQ
magnetooptika/ZQ
makačka/ZQ
malérečka/ZQ
maminka/ZQ
maniodepresivita/ZQ
Marcelka/ZQ
Martinka/ZQ
masochismus/Q
matinka/ZQ
Mazda/ZQ
megera/ZQ
memorandum/MQ
mesianismus/Q
metastruktura/ZQ
mezírka/ZQ
mikrobioloľka/ZQ
Milena/ZQ
minerálka/ZQ
mitra/ZQ
modlitba/ZQ
montgolfiéra/ZQ
motorka/ZQ
multikulturalismus/Q
myąlénka/ZQ
nadrealismus/Q
námaha/ZQ
následovnice/ZQ
Naxos/Q
neodbornice/ZQ
nestoudnice/ZQ
nikotinismus/Q
nosítka/MQ
numero/MQ
obleček/Q
ocaska/ZQ
Odolena/ZQ
oháňka/ZQ
oktaacetylsacharóza/ZQ
onkoloľka/ZQ
optoelektronika/ZQ
Osíčko/MQ
ostřička/ZQ
ozimka/ZQ
pálenice/ZQ
panoráma/KZQ
parazitismus/Q
pastilka/ZQ
pavláčka/ZQ
pendrek/Q
perónistka/ZQ
petrolejářka/ZQ
pipka/ZQ
placebo/MQ
pláľička/ZQ
ploątice/ZQ
podesta/ZQ
podstanice/ZQ
pochutina/ZQ
políček/Q
polątářek/Q
porada/ZQ
postkomunismus/Q
poupátko/MQ
prádelna/ZQ
pravděpodobno/MQN
princezna/ZQ
proláklina/ZQ
prostůrka/ZQ
prověrka/ZQ
prvoligistka/ZQ
předsíňka/ZQ
přesmyčka/ZQ
Přimda/ZQ
přívlastek/Q
psychosomatika/ZQ
puntíček/Q
radioléčba/ZQ
ranka/ZQ
regionalismus/Q
restaurátorka/ZQ
rizoto/MQ
rosa/ZQ
rozmarýna/ZQ
ručička/ZQ
rvačka/ZQ
řasinka/ZQ
sabotérka/ZQ
samosoudkyně/ZQ
sbíječka/ZQ
Sedmihradsko/MQ
seniorka/ZQ
sextiliarda/ZQ
sindhątina/ZQ
skládanka/ZQ
skulina/ZQ
slintavka/ZQ
sluľebnictvo/MQ
Sněľka/ZQ
sólo/MQ
spálenina/ZQ
spojka/ZQ
spuą»adlo/MQ
starousedlice/ZQ
stezka/ZQ
straka/ZQ
středoąkolačka/ZQ
Stvořidla/MQ
supernabídka/ZQ
světačka/ZQ
sýkořice/ZQ
ąamanismus/Q
ąestina/ZQ
ąkolička/ZQ
ąoférka/ZQ
ą»avnatka/ZQ
ąunka/ZQ
tanečnice/ZQ
telefoto/MQ
teritorium/MQ
thorium/MQ
tmářka/ZQ
toxicita/ZQ
trávnička/ZQ
trojice/ZQ
Třebsko/MQ
tůňka/ZQ
uctívačka/ZQ
ukladatelka/ZQ
unitaristka/ZQ
Úsobrno/MQ
uzlinka/ZQ
varhanářka/ZQ
věda/ZQ
Vendula/ZQ
věątka/ZQ
viklefistka/ZQ
vitrínka/ZQ
vlnovka/ZQ
Volta/ZQ
vrstvička/ZQ
výdobytek/Q
výměna/ZQ
vyskytovatelka/ZQ
vývěva/ZQ
xylóza/ZQ
zakladatelka/ZQ
zápustka/ZQ
závada/ZQ
zdrhovadlo/MQ
Zlátenka/ZQ
zornička/ZQ
Zuzana/ZQ
ľebernatka/ZQ
ľíravina/ZQ
